Wyoming, session 2025, SF0056.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 17-16-1420(a)(vi)(B), (C) and by
creating a new subparagraph (D), 17-16-1530(a)(viii)(A),
(B) and by creating a new subparagraph (C),
17-19-1420(a)(v)(A), (B) and by creating a new subparagraph
(C), 17-19-1530(a)(vii)(A), (B) and by creating a new
subparagraph (C), 17-29-705(c)(iii)(B), (C) and by creating
a new subparagraph (D) and 17-30-904(h)(iii)(C) and by
creating a new subparagraph (D) are amended to read:
17-16-1420. Grounds for administrative dissolution.
(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-16-1421 to administratively dissolve a
corporation if any of the following has occurred:
(vi) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:
(B) Has provided fraudulent information or
has failed to correct false information upon request of the
secretary of state on any filing under this act with the
secretary of state; or
(C) Cannot be served by either the
secretary of state or the registered agent at its address
provided pursuant to W.S. 17-28-107;. or
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
17-16-1530. Grounds for revocation.
(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-16-1531 to revoke the certificate of
authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state if:
(viii) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:
(A) Has provided fraudulent information or
has failed to correct false information upon request of the
secretary of state on any filing under this act with the
secretary of state; or
(B) Cannot be served either by the
registered agent or by mail or electronically by the
secretary of state acting as the agent for process;. or
(C) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
17-19-1420. Grounds for administrative dissolution.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-19-1421 to administratively dissolve a
corporation if any of the following has occurred:
(v) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:
(A) Has provided fraudulent information or
has failed to correct false information upon request of the
secretary of state on any filing under this act with the
secretary of state; or
(B) Cannot be served by either the
secretary of state or the registered agent at its address
provided pursuant to W.S. 17-28-107;. or
(C) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
17-19-1530. Grounds for revocation.
(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-19-1531 to revoke the certificate of
authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state if any of the following has
occurred:
(vii) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:
(A) Has provided fraudulent information or
has failed to correct false information upon request of the
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
secretary of state on any filing with the secretary of
state under this act; or
(B) Cannot be served either by the
registered agent or by mail or electronically by the
secretary of state acting as the agent for process;. or
(C) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
17-29-705. Administrative forfeiture of authority and
articles of organization.
(c) A limited liability company shall be deemed to be
transacting business within this state without authority,
to have forfeited any franchises, rights or privileges
acquired under the laws thereof and shall be deemed defunct
and to have forfeited its articles of organization or
certificate of authority acquired under the laws of this
state, and the forfeiture shall be made effective in the
manner provided in subsection (a) of this section, if:
(iii) It is in the public interest and the
limited liability company or any of its members:
(B) Has provided fraudulent information or
has failed to correct false information upon request of the
secretary of state on any filing with the secretary of
state under this chapter; or
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(C) Cannot be served by either the
registered agent or by mail or electronically by the
secretary of state acting as the agent for process;. or
(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
17-30-904. Administrative forfeiture of authority and
articles of formation.
(h) A statutory foundation shall be deemed to be
operating within this state without authority, to have
forfeited any rights or privileges acquired under the laws
of this state and shall be deemed to have forfeited its
articles of formation filed in this state if:
(iii) The public interest is served by
forfeiture and the statutory foundation, its founder or any
other person authorized to act on behalf of the statutory
foundation:
(C) Cannot be served by either the
registered agent or by the secretary of state acting as the
agent for process;. or
(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6